Missouri, session 2026, HB2525.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 34, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 34.075, to read as follows:
34.075. 1. In letting contracts for the performance of any job or service relating
to construction, infrastructure, transportation, energy or utilities, manufacturing,
health care, education, public safety, or water and waste management, the state shall
give preference to bidders whose employees are members of labor organizations when
the quality of performance promised is equal or better and the price quoted is the same
or less or whenever competing bids are, in their entirety, comparable.
2. As used in this section "labor organization" means any organization that
exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or of dealing with
employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or for other
mutual aid or protection in relation to employment.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.